Utah statutes.
31A-28-202.   Scope.
This part applies to protect resident policyowners and insureds under all
types of direct insurance, except:
(1)  life insurance;
(2)  annuity;
(3)  health insurance;
(4)  disability insurance;
(5)  mortgage guaranty insurance;
(6)  financial guaranty, or other forms of insurance offering protection
against investment risks;
(7)  fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding obligation;
(8)  credit insurance;
(9)  vendor's single interest insurance;
(10)  collateral protection insurance, or any similar insurance protecting the
interests of a creditor in a creditor-debtor transaction;
(11)  mechanical breakdown insurance, as defined in Section 31A-6a-101;
(12)  insurance of a warranty or service contract as defined in Section 31A-
6a-101;
(13)  title insurance;
(14)  ocean marine insurance;
(15)  any transaction between a person and an insurer, or an affiliate of a
person or insurer, that involves the transfer of investment or credit risk
unaccompanied by transfer of insurance risk; or
(16)  any insurance provided by or guaranteed by government.
